Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.525

State sales, use, and business and occupation taxes—Indian tribe compacts—Effect on local taxes.

Nothing in chapter 132, Laws of 2020 in any way limits, restricts, reduces, or affects local taxes authorized under chapter 82.14 RCW, RCW 81.104.170, Title 35, 36, or 84 RCW, or any other provision of state law authorizing a local tax.

[ 2020 c 132 s 3.]